en: Frozen roasted meats
fr: Viandes roties surgelées

en: Meats in sauce, Meat in sauce
fr: Viandes en sauce, Viande en sauce
hr: Meso u umaku
lt: Mėsos padaže

en: Beef in sauce
fr: Viandes de bœuf en sauce

en: Beef tongues in sauce
fr: Langues de bœuf en sauce

en: Tongue of beef with hot sauce
fr: Langues de bœuf sauce piquante, Langue de bœuf sauce piquante
hr: Goveđi jezik s ljutim umakom
lt: Jautienos liežuvis su aštriu padažu
nl: Kalfstong in pikante saus

en: Beef tongues with Madeira Sauce, Beef tongue with Madeira Sauce, Beef tongue with Madeira wine sauce
fi: Naudan kielet madeirakastikkeella
fr: Langues de bœuf sauce madère, Langue de bœuf sauce madère
hr: Goveđi jezici s madeira umakom
lt: Jautienos liežuvis su Madeira padažu
nl: Rundertong op basis van Madeirasaus

en: Ox muzzle in sauce
fr: Museau de boeuf en sauce

en: Ox muzzle in salad dressing sauce
fr: Museau de boeuf en vinaigrette

en: Dried meats
bg: Сушено месо
ca: Carns assecades
de: Trockenfleisch
es: Carnes secas
fi: kuivatut lihat
fr: Viandes séchées
he: בשרים מיובשים
hr: Sušeno meso
it: Carni essiccate
lt: Džiovintos mėsos
nl: Gedroogd vlees
pt: Carnes secas

en: Beef jerkies, beef jerky
de: Trockenfleisch vom Rind
fi: kuivalihat
fr: Viande de bœuf séchée
hr: Goveđi džerki
it: Jerky di manzo, Manzo essiccato
nl: Beef jerkies, Beef jerky

en: Steaks
de: Steaks
es: Filetes
fi: pihvit
fr: Steaks de viande, steaks, steacks
he: סטייקים
hr: Odresci
it: Bistecche
lt: Kepsniai
nl: Steaks
pt: Bifes
zh: 肉排

en: Meat patties
fr: Galettes à la viande
hr: Mesne polpete
lt: Mėsos paplotėliai

en: Beef patties
fr: Galettes au bœuf
hr: Goveđe pljeskavice
lt: Jautienos paplotėliai

en: Ground steaks
de: Hackfleischsteaks, Hacksteaks
es: Filetes picado
fi: jauhelihapihvit
fr: Steaks hachés, Steak haché
hr: Mljevene odreske
it: Carne macinata e hamburger
lt: Maltiniai
nl: Tartaarsteaks

en: Beef based burger with 15% fat
fr: Haché à base de bœuf cru à 15% de matières grasses, Préparation de viande hachée de boeuf crue à 15% de matières grasses
hr: Pljeskavica na bazi govedine s 15% masti
lt: Jautienos maltiniai su 15% riebalų

en: Snails and their products
fr: Escargots et dérivés

en: Snails preparations
es: Preparado de caracoles
fi: Etanavalmisteet
hr: Preparati od puževa
lt: Sraigių ruošiniai
nl: Producten met slakken
zh: 蜗牛准备材料

en: Mini appetizer puff pastries with snails
fr: Mini feuilletés apéritifs aux escargots

en: Large puff pastries with snails, Snails in puff pastry
fr: Grands feuilletés aux escargots, Feuilleté aux escargots
hr: Pužići u lisnatom tijestu
lt: Sraigės sloksniuotoje tešloje

en: Snails
bg: Охлюви
de: Schnecken
es: Caracoles
fi: etanat
fr: Escargots
he: חלזונות
hr: Puževi
it: Lumache, Chiocciole
ja: カタツムリ, かたつむり
la: Helix aspersa
lt: Sraigės
nl: Slakken
zh: 蜗牛, 田螺